Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.176

Employee performance evaluations—Written notification of deficiencies.

Each employee whose work is judged unsatisfactory shall be notified in writing of the areas in which the work is considered deficient. Unless the deficiency is extreme, the employee shall be given an opportunity to demonstrate improvement.

[ 1985 c 461 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 461: See note following RCW 41.06.020.